Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
SUPREME COURT

Cross References

Uniform electronic legal material act, see chapter 98.

Rules of Court

See generally Supreme Court Rules; Hawaii Rules of Appellate
Procedure; Hawaii Court Records Rules; Hawaii Electronic Filing and Service Rules.

Law Journals and Reviews

Judicial Review and Sexual Freedom. 30 UH L. Rev. 1 (2007).

§602-1 How constituted. The supreme court,
pursuant to section 2 of article VI of the Constitution, shall consist of a
chief justice and four associate justices. [L 1892, c 57, §49; am L 1903, c 32,
§13; RL 1925, §2221; RL 1935, §3590; RL 1945, §9601; RL 1955, §214-1; am L Sp
1959 1st, c 5, §2(a); HRS §602-1; ree L 1979, c 111, pt of §2]

Cross References

Retirement allowance, see §88-74.

Tenure, removal, retirement, see Const. art. VI, §§3, 5.

Case Notes

Provision of will of filling of vacancies among the trustees
by choice of majority of the justices, how interpreted. 23 H. 575 (1917),
aff'd 250 F. 145 (1980).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next